src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - C - zhiishiib :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     zhiishiib+NA: zhiishiib
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+zhiishiib+NA: nizhiishiib
     2+zhiishiib+NA: gizhiishiib
     3+zhiishiib+NA: ozhiishiib
     X+zhiishiib+NA: izhiishiib
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     zhiishiib+NA+Con: zhiishiibenh
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim: zhiishiibens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej: zhiishiibish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     zhiishiib+NA+Prt: zhiishiibiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     zhiishiib+NA+4: zhiishiiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Loc: zhiishiibing
     zhiishiib+NA+Pl: zhiishiibag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con: nizhiishiibenh
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim: nizhiishiibens
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con: gizhiishiibenh
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim: gizhiishiibens
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con: ozhiishiibenh
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim: ozhiishiibens
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con: izhiishiibenh
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim: izhiishiibens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos: nizhiishiibim
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos: gizhiishiibim
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos: ozhiishiibim
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos: izhiishiibim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej: nizhiishiibish
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej: gizhiishiibish
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej: ozhiishiibish
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej: izhiishiibish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl: nizhiishiibinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl: gizhiishiibinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl: gizhiishiibiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4: ozhiishiibini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl: ozhiishiibiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Prt: nizhiishiibiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Prt: gizhiishiibiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Prt: ozhiishiibiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibidig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Prt: izhiishiibiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Voc+Pl: izhiishiibidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+4: nizhiishiiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Loc: nizhiishiibing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pl: nizhiishiibag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+4: gizhiishiiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Loc: gizhiishiibing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pl: gizhiishiibag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+4: ozhiishiiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Loc: ozhiishiibing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pl: ozhiishiibag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+4: izhiishiiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Loc: izhiishiibing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pl: izhiishiibag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: zhiishiibenyish
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: zhiishiibensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Prt: zhiishiibenyiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibenyidig
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Prt: zhiishiibensiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibensidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+4: zhiishiibenyin
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: zhiishiibenying
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: zhiishiibenyig
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+4: zhiishiibensan
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: zhiishiibensing
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: zhiishiibensag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt: zhiishiibishiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibishidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+4: zhiishiibishan
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibishing
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibishag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Prt+4: zhiishiibibaniin
     zhiishiib+NA+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibibaniing
     zhiishiib+NA+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos: nizhiishiibenyim
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos: nizhiishiibensim
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos: gizhiishiibenyim
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos: gizhiishiibensim
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos: ozhiishiibenyim
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos: ozhiishiibensim
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos: izhiishiibenyim
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos: izhiishiibensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: nizhiishiibenyish
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: nizhiishiibensish
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: gizhiishiibenyish
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: gizhiishiibensish
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: ozhiishiibenyish
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: ozhiishiibensish
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: izhiishiibenyish
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: izhiishiibensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+1+Pl: nizhiishiibenyinaan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+1+Pl: nizhiishiibensinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+1+Pl: gizhiishiibenyinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3+Pl: gizhiishiibenyiwaa
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gizhiishiibensinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3+Pl: gizhiishiibensiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3+4: ozhiishiibenyini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3+Pl: ozhiishiibenyiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3+4: ozhiishiibensini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3+Pl: ozhiishiibensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Prt: nizhiishiibenyiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibenyidig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Prt: nizhiishiibensiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibensidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Prt: gizhiishiibenyiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibenyidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Prt: gizhiishiibensiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibensidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Prt: ozhiishiibenyiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibenyidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Prt: ozhiishiibensiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibensidig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Prt: izhiishiibenyiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: izhiishiibenyidig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Prt: izhiishiibensiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: izhiishiibensidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+4: nizhiishiibenyin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: nizhiishiibenying
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: nizhiishiibenyig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+4: nizhiishiibensan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: nizhiishiibensing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: nizhiishiibensag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+4: gizhiishiibenyin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: gizhiishiibenying
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: gizhiishiibenyig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+4: gizhiishiibensan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: gizhiishiibensing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: gizhiishiibensag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+4: ozhiishiibenyin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: ozhiishiibenying
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: ozhiishiibenyig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+4: ozhiishiibensan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: ozhiishiibensing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: ozhiishiibensag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+4: izhiishiibenyin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: izhiishiibenying
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: izhiishiibenyig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+4: izhiishiibensan
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: izhiishiibensing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: izhiishiibensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej: nizhiishiibimish
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej: gizhiishiibimish
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej: ozhiishiibimish
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej: izhiishiibimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl: nizhiishiibiminaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl: gizhiishiibiminaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl: gizhiishiibimiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4: ozhiishiibimini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl: ozhiishiibimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt: nizhiishiibimiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibimidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt: gizhiishiibimiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibimidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt: ozhiishiibimiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibimidig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt: izhiishiibimiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: izhiishiibimidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+4: nizhiishiibiman
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Loc: nizhiishiibiming
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pl: nizhiishiibimag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+4: gizhiishiibiman
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Loc: gizhiishiibiming
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pl: gizhiishiibimag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+4: ozhiishiibiman
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Loc: ozhiishiibiming
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pl: ozhiishiibimag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+4: izhiishiibiman
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Loc: izhiishiibiming
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pl: izhiishiibimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl: nizhiishiibishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gizhiishiibishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl: gizhiishiibishiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4: ozhiishiibishini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl: ozhiishiibishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt: nizhiishiibishiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibishidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt: gizhiishiibishiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibishidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt: ozhiishiibishiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibishidig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt: izhiishiibishiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: izhiishiibishidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+4: nizhiishiibishan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: nizhiishiibishing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: nizhiishiibishag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+4: gizhiishiibishan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: gizhiishiibishing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: gizhiishiibishag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+4: ozhiishiibishan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: ozhiishiibishing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: ozhiishiibishag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+4: izhiishiibishan
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: izhiishiibishing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: izhiishiibishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Prt: nizhiishiibinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibiwaadig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Prt: ozhiishiibiniiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibiniidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Prt: ozhiishiibiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+4: nizhiishiibinaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibinaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+4: gizhiishiibinaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibinaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+4: gizhiishiibiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+4: ozhiishiibiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Loc: ozhiishiibiniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Pl: ozhiishiibiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+4: ozhiishiibiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Prt+4: nizhiishiibibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Prt+4: gizhiishiibibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Prt+4: ozhiishiibibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibibaniing
